Washington statutes.
RCW 39.12.110

Failure to provide or allow inspection of records.

Any employer, contractor, or subcontractor who fails to provide requested records, or fails to allow adequate inspection of records in an investigation by the department of labor and industries under this chapter within sixty calendar days of service of the department's request may not use the records in any proceeding under this chapter to challenge the correctness of any determination by the department that wages are owed, that a record or statement is false, or that the employer, contractor, or subcontractor has failed to file a record or statement.

[ 2011 c 92 s 1.]